North Carolina, session 2025, SB912.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. ADVANCEMENT OF MENOPAUSE RESEARCH
SECTION 1.1.(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this Part:
(1) Menopause. – The point in time defined as 12 consecutive months after the
last menstrual period.
(2) Menopause-related care. – Medical, behavioral health, and supportive
services addressing symptoms associated with perimenopause, menopause,
and postmenopause, including, but not limited to, hormonal and
non-hormonal treatments.
(3) Perimenopause. – The transitional period during which the body experiences
a natural decline in reproductive hormones, resulting in the end of menstrual
cycles. This transition typically lasts four to eight years but may last longer
than a decade.
(4) Postmenopause. – The life stage following menopause.
SECTION 1.1.(b) Comprehensive Evaluation of Current Research. – The
Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) shall conduct a comprehensive evaluation
of the current state of research regarding menopause-related care. In conducting this evaluation,
the DHHS shall determine and analyze at least all of the following:
(1) Existing gaps in scientific knowledge and understanding regarding the
etiology, symptomatology, and clinical management of perimenopause,
menopause, and postmenopause.
(2) Clinical and other barriers to the timely diagnosis and effective treatment of
menopause.
(3) Current availability, safety, and clinical efficacy of existing pharmacological
and non-pharmacological therapies for menopause.
(4) The extent and adequacy of peer-reviewed research specifically focused on
individuals undergoing the menopausal transition.
*S912-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(5) Existing gaps in the curricula and continuing medical education of healthcare
providers concerning menopause management and patient care.
(6) Analysis of the disproportionate physical, mental, and socioeconomic impacts
of perimenopause, menopause, and postmenopause on underserved and
vulnerable populations, including the following:
a. Black women.
b. Individuals who identify as LGBTQ+.
c. Neurodivergent individuals.
d. Individuals of lower socioeconomic status.
e. Incarcerated individuals.
SECTION 1.1.(c) Data Collection. – The DHHS shall collect data on the percentage
of North Carolinians experiencing menopause-related symptoms across the following five
decennial age groups:
(1) Ages 20-29.
(2) Ages 30-39.
(3) Ages 40-49.
(4) Ages 50-59.
(5) Ages 60-69.
SECTION 1.1.(d) Statewide Strategic Plan. – The DHHS shall develop a statewide
strategic plan based on the evaluation conducted pursuant to subsection (b) of this section and
the data collected pursuant to subsection (c) of this section to accomplish all of the following:
(1) To address identified gaps in scientific knowledge and understanding
regarding the etiology, symptomatology, and clinical management of
perimenopause, menopause, and postmenopause.
(2) To promote equitable access to menopause-related care.
(3) To identify priorities for future clinical and public health research specifically
focused on the transition from perimenopause through postmenopause.
SECTION 1.1.(e) Reporting Requirement. – By December 1, 2027, the DHHS shall
submit a report of its activities under this section to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee
on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division. The report shall include at least
all of the following:
(1) The findings and recommendations of the comprehensive evaluation
conducted pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.
(2) The data collected pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.
(3) The statewide strategic plan developed pursuant to subsection (d) of this
section.
SECTION 1.1.(f) Appropriations. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, the sum of five million
dollars ($5,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated and used
as follows:
(1) To complete the comprehensive evaluation, data collection, strategic
planning, and reporting required by this section.
(2) To design, coordinate, and oversee a statewide menopause education and
awareness campaign.
(3) To promote and support healthcare provider training and continuing medical
education initiatives that improve healthcare provider competency in
menopause-related care and expand access to menopause-related care.
SECTION 1.1.(g) Effective Date. – This Part becomes effective July 1, 2026.

PART II. CONTINUING MEDICAL EDUCATION INCENTIVES
Page 2 Senate Bill 912-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2.1.(a) As used in this section, the term "qualifying physician" means a
physician licensed to practice in this State who meets both of the following criteria:
(1) Specializes in internal medicine, family medicine, obstetrics and gynecology,
cardiology, endocrinology, neurology, or psychiatry.
(2) Has a patient base that is at least twenty-five percent (25%) adult women
under age 65.
SECTION 2.1.(b) For the period beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2032,
qualifying physicians subject to the continuing medical education (CME) requirements of
Chapter 90 of the General Statutes shall receive two hours of CME credit for each hour of CME
completed in perimenopausal, menopausal, or postmenopausal care. This double credit incentive
is available for up to eight hours of CME completed during the incentive period.
SECTION 2.1.(c) The Department of Health and Human Services, in collaboration
with the North Carolina Medical Board, shall promote this continuing medical education
incentive and other available training opportunities approved by the North Carolina Medical
Board to improve healthcare provider competency in menopause-related care.

PART III. MEDICAID AND HEALTH INSURANCE COVERAGE OF
MENOPAUSE-RELATED CARE

MEDICAID COVERAGE OF MENOPAUSE-RELATED CARE
SECTION 3.1. The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health
Benefits (DHB), shall take all necessary actions, including seeking approval from the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS), to implement Medicaid coverage for
menopause-related care. This coverage shall include (i) diagnosis and treatment of
perimenopause, menopause, and postmenopause, (ii) hormone replacement therapy (HRT),
where medically appropriate, (iii) non-hormonal treatments and therapies, (iv) behavioral health
services related to menopause symptoms, and (v) preventive screenings and counseling. DHB
shall ensure that this coverage is provided without undue utilization management barriers and
that clinical coverage policies reflect current clinical standards and evidence-based guidelines.

HEALTH INSURANCE COVERAGE OF MENOPAUSE-RELATED CARE
SECTION 3.2.(a) Article 3 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 58-3-271. Coverage for perimenopausal and menopausal care.
(a) The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) FDA. – The federal Food and Drug Administration.
(2) Formulation. – Any of the following:
a. A tablet or capsule.
b. A transdermal patch.
c. A topical spray.
d. A cream, gel, or lotion.
e. A suppository, cream, or silicone ring.
(3) Reserved for future codification purposes.
(4) Menopause. – The permanent cessation of ovulation so that ovaries stop
releasing follicles and stop producing estrogen and progesterone. For
individuals with an intact uterus, menopause is marked by a 12-month absence
of menstruation.
(5) Method of administration. – Administering a formulation via an oral, topical,
vaginal, rectal, subcutaneous, injectable, or intravenous route of
administration.
Senate Bill 912-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6) Perimenopause. – The transition period from the late reproductive phase to
the permanent cessation of ovarian function with absence of menstruation.
(b) A health benefit plan offered in this State shall provide coverage for perimenopausal
and menopausal care and treatment administered by a licensed healthcare provider acting within
the scope of the provider's license. This coverage shall include, at a minimum, coverage for all
of the following symptoms of perimenopause and menopause:
(1) Irregular to heavy menstrual period.
(2) Temporary cognitive changes related to the menopause transition.
(3) Vaginal or bladder symptoms.
(4) Decrease in fertility.
(5) Loss of bone.
(6) Hot flashes.
(7) Mood changes.
(8) Weight gain.
(9) Increase in low-density lipoprotein cholesterol levels.
(10) Sleep disruption, including night sweats.
(c) Coverage required under subsection (b) of this section shall not be subject to annual
deductibles, copayments, or coinsurance.
(d) A health benefit plan that offers coverage for outpatient prescription drugs shall
include coverage for the evaluation and treatment options for symptoms of perimenopause and
menopause, as is deemed necessary by the treating healthcare provider. Coverage under this
section includes coverage for the treating healthcare provider to adjust the dose of a prescription
drug consistent with clinical care recommendations.
(e) Coverage required under subsection (d) of this section shall be provided without the
use of any utilization management for any treatments that are approved by the FDA, including,
at a minimum, all of the following:
(1) At least one outpatient prescription drug in each formulation of, and the
associated method of administration for, FDA-regulated systemic hormone
therapy.
(2) At least one outpatient prescription drug in each formulation of, and the
associated method of administration for, non-hormonal medicals for each
menopause symptom.
(3) At least one outpatient prescription drug in each formulation of, and the
associated method of administration for, treatment of genitourinary syndrome
of menopause.
(4) At least one outpatient prescription drug from each class of medications
approved to prevent and treat osteoporosis.
(f) Coverage under this section shall be provided without discrimination on the basis of
gender expression or identity.
(g) An insurer offering a health benefit with coverage under this section shall annually
provide current clinical care recommendations for hormone therapy from the Menopause Society
or any other nationally recognized professional association to all primary care providers that (i)
are contracted as providers participating in an insurer's provider network and (ii) treat covered
persons with perimenopause and menopause.
(h) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the coverage for medically
necessary outpatient prescription drugs."
SECTION 3.2.(b) This section is effective October 1, 2027, and applies to insurance
contracts issued, renewed, or amended on or after that date.
SECTION 3.3.(a) G.S. 135-48.51 reads as rewritten:
"§ 135-48.51. Coverage and operational mandates related to Chapter 58 of the General
Statutes.
Page 4 Senate Bill 912-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
The following provisions of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes apply to the State Health Plan:
…
(9a) G.S. 58-3-271, Coverage for perimenopausal and menopausal care.
…."
SECTION 3.3.(b) This section is effective October 1, 2027, and applies as of the
start of the next plan year following that date.

PART IV. PROTECTIONS AGAINST EMPLOYMENT DISCRIMINATION ON
ACCOUNT OF MENOPAUSE
SECTION 4.1. Chapter 95 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 24.
"Menopause Nondiscrimination Act.
"§ 95-280. Definitions; findings; scope.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) A significant portion of the North Carolina workforce experiences menopause
during peak career years, and the protections afforded by this Article are
necessary to support workforce retention and economic stability.
(2) No worker in this State should experience discrimination, harassment, or
bullying based on biological conditions that are largely outside of their
control.
(b) The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Qualified employee or prospective employee. – A person who, with or without
reasonable accommodations, can perform the essential functions of the
employment position that the individual holds or desires. For the purposes of
this Article, due consideration shall be given to the employer's judgment as to
what functions of a job are essential, and if an employer has prepared a written
description before advertising or interviewing applicants for the job, this
description shall be considered evidence of the essential functions of the job.
The fact that an individual has applied for, received, or continues to receive
private insurance or government assistance based upon the individual's
disability shall not be determinative as to whether the individual is qualified
as defined herein nor shall it constitute an estoppel or otherwise serve as a
basis to deny the individual the protections of this Article.
a. A qualified individual with a disability does not include any employee
or applicant who is currently engaging in the illegal use of drugs, when
the employer acts on the basis of such use.
b. The term "illegal use of drugs" means the use of drugs, the possession
or distribution of which is unlawful under the Controlled Substances
Act, 21 U.S.C. § 812. The term does not include the use of a drug taken
under supervision by a licensed healthcare professional or other uses
authorized by the Controlled Substances Act or other provisions of
federal law.
c. The term "drug" means a controlled substance, as defined in schedules
I through V of section 202 of the Controlled Substances Act.
(2) Reasonably accommodate. – Providing reasonable accommodations,
including, but not limited to, more frequent or longer breaks, time off to
recover from childbirth, acquisition or modification of equipment, seating,
temporary transfer to a less strenuous or hazardous position, job restructuring,
light duty, break time and private non-bathroom space for expressing breast
milk, assistance with manual labor, or modified work schedules.
Senate Bill 912-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Related conditions. – Includes, but is not limited to, lactation or the need to
express breast milk for a nursing child or the need to manage the effects of
vasomotor symptoms.
(4) Undue hardship. – An action requiring significant difficulty or expense to the
employer. In making a determination of undue hardship, the factors that may
be considered include, but shall not be limited to, the following:
a. The nature and cost of the accommodation;
b. The overall financial resources of the employer, the overall size of the
business of the employer with respect to the number of employees, and
the number, type, and location of its facilities; and
c. The effect on expenses and resources or the impact otherwise of such
accommodation upon the operation of the employer. Provided that the
fact that the employer provides, or would be required to provide, a
similar accommodation to other classes of employees who need it,
such as those who are injured on the job or those with disabilities, shall
create a rebuttable presumption that the accommodation does not
impose an undue hardship on the employer.
(c) This Article applies to employers having four or more employees.
"§ 95-281. Menopause discrimination unlawful; rights; obligations.
(a) It is an unlawful employment practice for an employer to do any of the following:
(1) Refuse to reasonably accommodate an employee's or prospective employee's
condition related to pregnancy, childbirth, menopause, or a related medical
condition, including, but not limited to, the need to express breast milk for a
nursing child, if she so requests, unless the employer can demonstrate that the
accommodation would pose an undue hardship on the employer's program,
enterprise, or business.
(2) Require an employee to take leave if another reasonable accommodation can
be provided to an employee's condition related to pregnancy, childbirth,
menopause, or a related medical condition.
(3) Deny employment opportunities to an employee or prospective employee, if
such denial is based on the refusal of the employer to reasonably
accommodate an employee's or prospective employee's condition related to
pregnancy, childbirth, menopause, or a related medical condition.
(4) Fail to provide written notice, including notice conspicuously posted at an
employer's place of business in an area accessible to employees, of the right
to be free from discrimination in relation to pregnancy, childbirth, menopause,
and related conditions, including the right to reasonable accommodations for
conditions related to pregnancy, childbirth, menopause, or related conditions
pursuant to this section to:
a. New employees at the commencement of employment.
b. Existing employees within 120 days after the effective date of
December 1, 2026.
c. Any employee who notifies the employer of her pregnancy or
menopause within 10 days of such notification.
(b) It is unlawful for any person, whether or not an employer, employment agency, labor
organization, or employee, to aid, abet, incite, compel, or coerce the doing of any act declared by
this section to be an unlawful employment practice or to obstruct or prevent any person from
complying with the provisions of this section or any order issued pursuant to this section or to
attempt directly or indirectly to commit any act declared by this section to be an unlawful
employment practice.
Page 6 Senate Bill 912-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) The employer shall have the burden of proving undue hardship. The fact that the
employer provides, or would be required to provide, a similar accommodation to other classes of
employees who need it, such as those who are injured on the job or those with disabilities, shall
create a rebuttable presumption that the accommodation does not impose an undue hardship on
the employer.
(d) No employer shall be required by this section to create additional employment that
the employer would not otherwise have created, unless the employer does so, or would do so, for
other classes of employees who need accommodation, such as those who are injured on the job
or those with disabilities.
(e) No employer shall be required to discharge any employee, transfer any employee with
more seniority, or promote any employee who is not qualified to perform the job, unless the
employer does so, or would do so, to accommodate other classes of employees who need it, such
as those who are injured on the job or those with disabilities.
"§ 95-282. Menopause recognized for employment protections; reasonable
accommodations.
(a) Employers shall provide reasonable accommodations for employees experiencing
menopause-related symptoms, similar to protections afforded for pregnancy-related conditions.
(b) Employers shall not retaliate against employees who request accommodations related
to menopause.
(c) Reasonable accommodations for physically demanding work may include, but are not
limited to, the following:
(1) Extra or frequent breaks throughout the day.
(2) Access to cold water or cooling devices such as fans, towels, and misters.
(3) Consistent access to restrooms.
(4) Flexible uniforms or adapted dress codes.
(5) Comfortable workspaces, such as adjustable temperature and dedicated rest
areas.
(6) Shift in job duties to reduce physical labor.
(7) Designated areas to freshen up, change clothes, or access sanitary products.
(d) Reasonable accommodations for intellectually demanding work may include, but are
not limited to, the following:
(1) Flexible work hours or alternative work schedules.
(2) Flexible deadlines or deadline extensions, as appropriate.
(3) Use of supportive services and devices, such as adjustable desk furniture,
notetaking support, and adaptive tools.
(4) Access to quiet workspaces or white noise sound machines.
(5) Broad spectrum or natural lighting.
(6) Flexible meeting schedules.
(7) Access to task management tools.
(e) Reasonable accommodations for emotionally demanding work may include, but are
not limited to, the following:
(1) Time off for medical appointments.
(2) Telework options.
(3) Employee resource groups.
(4) Individual coaching or therapy sessions.
(5) Employee assistance programs (EAPs).
(f) Employers are encouraged to implement supportive workplace policies, including:
(1) Employee assistance programs (EAPs).
(2) Employee resource groups (ERGs).
(3) Education and awareness initiatives.
Senate Bill 912-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(g) Menopause and menopause-related conditions shall be recognized under State
employment discrimination and nonretaliation protections granted by this Chapter or by any
other provision of State law.
"§ 95-283. Construction of Article.
Nothing in this Article shall be construed to:
(1) Require an individual with a need related to pregnancy, childbirth,
menopause, or a related medical condition to accept an accommodation which
the individual chooses not to accept.
(2) Affect any other provision of law relating to sex discrimination, pregnancy,
or menopause or to preempt, limit, diminish, or otherwise affect any other law
that provides greater protection or specific benefits with respect to pregnancy,
childbirth, menopause, or medical conditions related to childbirth or
menopause."
SECTION 4.2. Effective July 1, 2026, there is appropriated from the General Fund
to the Department of Labor the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for the
2026-2027 fiscal year for implementation of this act.
SECTION 4.3. Except as otherwise provided, this Part becomes effective December
1, 2026, and applies to hiring and employment decisions made, and actions taken, on or after that
date.

PART V. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 5.1. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 8 Senate Bill 912-First Edition